Georgia statutes. TITLE 13 Contracts
PART 1 Bonds

Editor’s notes.

Former Code Sections 13-10-1 and 13-10-2, concerning bid bonds, other securities and periodic progress payments, were repealed by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 1 and were based on Ga. L. 1910, p. 86, § 1; Ga. L. 1916, p. 94, § 1; Code 1933, § 23-1705; Ga. L. 1956, p. 340, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 810, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 686, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1043, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 348, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 278, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 461, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1794, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 777, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 13; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1048, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 6; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 13.

13-10-1.
“State” defined.

As used in this article, the term “state” means the state of Georgia, any agency of the state, and any state authority.

History.
Code 1981, §13-10-1, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 1.

13-10-2.
Approval of bond; strengthening of bond.

Any bid bond, performance bond, payment bond, or security deposit required for a state public works construction contract shall be approved and filed with the treasurer or the person performing the duties usually performed by a treasurer of the obligee named in such bond. At the option of the state, if the surety named in the bond is other than a surety company authorized by law to do business in this state pursuant to a current certificate of authority to transact surety business by the Commissioner of Insurance, such bond shall not be approved and filed unless such surety is on the United States Department of Treasury’s list of approved bond sureties.

Any bid bond, performance bond, or payment bond required by this chapter shall be approved as to form and as to the solvency of the surety by an officer of the state or the agency or authority of the state negotiating the contract on behalf of the state. In the case of a bid bond, such approval shall be obtained prior to acceptance of the bid or proposal. In the case of a payment bond or a performance bond, such approval shall be obtained prior to the execution of the contract.

Whenever, in the judgment of the obligee:

Any surety on a bid, performance, or payment bond has become insolvent;

Any corporate surety is no longer certified or approved by the Commissioner of Insurance to do business in the state; or

For any cause there are no longer proper or sufficient sureties on any or all of the bonds,

All state agencies, authorities, departments, commissions, boards, and similar entities shall adhere to the policies and procedures contained in the State Construction Manual for project management and procurement of, and contracting for, design, construction, and other project related professional services for all state owned buildings in Georgia funded by state bonds or other state revenue. The State Construction Manual shall be jointly edited and posted on a state website by the Georgia State Financing and Investment Commission and the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia and shall be updated on a periodic basis to reflect evolving owner needs and industry best practices after consultation with other state agency and industry stakeholders.

To the extent permitted by law, no state agency, authority, department, commission, board, or similar entity that contracts for public works construction shall, in its bid documents, specifications, project agreements, or other controlling documents for a public works construction contract:

Require or prohibit bidders, offerors, contractors, subcontractors, or material suppliers to enter into or adhere to prehire agreements, project labor agreements, collective bargaining agreements, or any other agreement with one or more labor organizations on the same or other related construction projects; or

Discriminate against, or treat differently, bidders, offerors, contractors, subcontractors, or material suppliers for becoming or refusing to become or remain signatories or otherwise to adhere to agreements with one or more labor organizations on the same or other related construction projects.

Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit bidders, offerors, contractors, subcontractors, or material suppliers from voluntarily entering into agreements described in paragraph (1) of this subsection.

The head of a governmental entity may exempt a particular public works construction contract from the requirements of any or all of the provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection if the governmental entity finds, after public notice and a hearing, that special circumstances require an exemption to avert an imminent threat to public health or safety. A finding of special circumstance under this paragraph shall not be based on the possibility or presence of a labor dispute concerning the use of contractors or subcontractors who are nonsignatories to, or otherwise do not adhere to, agreements with one or more labor organizations or concerning employees on the particular project who are not members of or affiliated with a labor organization.

the obligee may require the contractor to strengthen any or all of the bonds or to furnish a new or additional bond or bonds within ten days. Thereupon, if so ordered by the obligee, all work on the contract shall cease unless such new or additional bond or bonds are furnished. If such bond or bonds are not furnished within such time, the obligee may terminate the contract and complete the same as the agent of and at the expense of the contractor and his or her sureties.

History.
Code 1981, §13-10-2, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 1.

13-10-3.
Determining Georgia residency for businesses; preferences; adherence to policies and procedures of State Construction Manual; public works construction contracts.

For the purpose of determining residency under this Code section, a Georgia resident business shall include any business that regularly maintains a place from which business is physically conducted in Georgia for at least one year prior to any bid or proposal submitted pursuant to this Code section or a new business that is domiciled in Georgia which regularly maintains a place from which business is physically conducted in Georgia; provided, however, that a place of business shall not include a post office box, site trailer, or temporary structure.

Whenever the state contracts for the doing of a public work, materialmen, contractors, builders, architects, engineers, and laborers resident in the State of Georgia are to be granted the same preference over materialmen, contractors, builders, architects, engineers, and laborers resident in another state in the same manner, on the same basis, and to the same extent that preference is granted in awarding bids for the same goods or services by such other state to materialmen, contractors, builders, architects, engineers, and laborers resident in such other state over materialmen, contractors, builders, architects, engineers, and laborers resident in the State of Georgia. However, these requirements shall in no way impair the ability of the state to compare the quality of materials proposed for purchase and to compare the qualifications, character, responsibility, and fitness of materialmen, contractors, builders, architects, engineers, and laborers proposed for employment in its consideration of the purchase of materials or employment of persons. This subsection shall not apply to transportation projects for which federal aid funds are available.

History.
Code 1981, §13-10-3, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 308, § 1/SB 447; Ga. L. 2013, p. 628, § 1/SB 179.

13-10-4.
Limitation on disqualification of bidders upon lack of previous experience.

In awarding contracts based upon sealed competitive bids or sealed competitive proposals, no bidder shall be disqualified from a bid or proposal or denied prequalification based upon:

A lack of previous experience with a job of the size for which the bid or proposal is being sought if:

The bid or proposal is not more than 30 percent greater in scope or cost from the bidder’s previous experience in jobs;

The bidder has experience in performing the work for which bids or proposals are sought; and

The bidder is capable of being bonded by a surety which meets the qualifications of the bid documents for a bid bond, a performance bond, and a payment bond as required for the scope of the work for which the bid or proposal is being sought; or

A lack of previous experience with the construction delivery method to be used for the job for which the bid or proposal is being sought.

History.
Code 1981, §13-10-4, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 126, § 1/SB 168; Ga. L. 2018, p. 343, § 1/HB 899.